Illinois, session 104th, HB3296.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 19-4 and by adding Section 1A-70 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/1A-70 new)7    Sec. 1A-70. Voter Safety Confidentiality Program. The 8State Board of Elections shall create a Voter Safety 9Confidentiality Program to remove the address of voters who 10choose to participate in the program from any list of 11registered voters available to the public. A voter who is an 12elected official, first responder, police officer, election 13worker, or victim of domestic violence shall be eligible to 14participate in the program. The State Board of Elections shall 15adopt rules to implement and administer the program. 16    (10 ILCS 5/19-4)  (from Ch. 46, par. 19-4)17    Sec. 19-4. Mailing or delivery of ballots; time. 18Immediately upon the receipt of such application either by 19mail or electronic means, not more than 90 days nor less than 5 20days prior to such election, or by personal delivery not more 21than 90 days nor less than one day prior to such election, at 22the office of such election authority, it shall be the duty of   HB3296- 2 -LRB104 11004 SPS 21086 b1such election authority to examine the records to ascertain 2whether or not such applicant is lawfully entitled to vote as 3requested, including a verification of the applicant's 4signature on file with the office of the election authority, 5and if found so to be entitled to vote, to post within one 6business day thereafter the name, street address, ward and 7precinct number or township and district number, as the case 8may be, of such applicant given on a list, the pages of which 9are to be numbered consecutively to be kept by such election 10authority for such purpose in a conspicuous, open and public 11place accessible to the public at the entrance of the office of 12such election authority, and in such a manner that such list 13may be viewed without necessity of requesting permission 14therefor. Within one day after posting the name and other 15information of an applicant for a vote by mail ballot, the 16election authority shall transmit by electronic means pursuant 17to a process established by the State Board of Elections that 18name and other posted information to the State Board of 19Elections, which shall maintain those names and other 20information in an electronic format on its website, arranged 21by county and accessible to State and local political 22committees. Within 2 business days after posting a name and 23other information on the list within its office, but no sooner 24than 40 days before an election, the election authority shall 25mail, postage prepaid, or deliver in person in such office, or 26deliver via electronic transmission pursuant to Section   HB3296- 3 -LRB104 11004 SPS 21086 b119-2.6, an official ballot or ballots if more than one are to 2be voted at said election. Mail delivery of Temporarily Absent 3Student ballot applications pursuant to Section 19-12.3 shall 4be by nonforwardable mail. However, for the consolidated 5election, vote by mail ballots for certain precincts may be 6delivered to applicants not less than 25 days before the 7election if so much time is required to have prepared and 8printed the ballots containing the names of persons nominated 9for offices at the consolidated primary. The election 10authority shall enclose with each vote by mail ballot or 11application written instructions on how voting assistance 12shall be provided pursuant to Section 17-14 and a document, 13written and approved by the State Board of Elections, 14informing the vote by mail voter of the required postage for 15returning the application and ballot, and enumerating the 16circumstances under which a person is authorized to vote by 17vote by mail ballot pursuant to this Article; such document 18shall also include a statement informing the applicant that if 19he or she falsifies or is solicited by another to falsify his 20or her eligibility to cast a vote by mail ballot, such 21applicant or other is subject to penalties pursuant to Section 2229-10 and Section 29-20 of the Election Code. Each election 23authority shall maintain a list of the name, street address, 24ward and precinct, or township and district number, as the 25case may be, of all applicants who have returned vote by mail 26ballots to such authority, and the name of such vote by mail   HB3296- 4 -LRB104 11004 SPS 21086 b1voter shall be added to such list within one business day from 2receipt of such ballot. If the vote by mail ballot envelope 3indicates that the voter was assisted in casting the ballot, 4the name of the person so assisting shall be included on the 5list. The list, the pages of which are to be numbered 6consecutively, shall be kept by each election authority in a 7conspicuous, open, and public place accessible to the public 8at the entrance of the office of the election authority and in 9a manner that the list may be viewed without necessity of 10requesting permission for viewing.11    Each election authority shall maintain a list for each 12election of the voters to whom it has issued vote by mail 13ballots. The list shall be maintained for each precinct within 14the jurisdiction of the election authority. Prior to the 15opening of the polls on election day, the election authority 16shall deliver to the judges of election in each precinct the 17list of registered voters in that precinct to whom vote by mail 18ballots have been issued by mail.19    Each election authority shall maintain a list for each 20election of voters to whom it has issued temporarily absent 21student ballots. The list shall be maintained for each 22election jurisdiction within which such voters temporarily 23abide. Immediately after the close of the period during which 24application may be made by mail or electronic means for vote by 25mail ballots, each election authority shall mail to each other 26election authority within the State a certified list of all   HB3296- 5 -LRB104 11004 SPS 21086 b1such voters temporarily abiding within the jurisdiction of the 2other election authority.3    In the event that the return address of an application for 4ballot by a physically incapacitated elector is that of a 5facility licensed or certified under the Nursing Home Care 6Act, the Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, 7the ID/DD Community Care Act, or the MC/DD Act, within the 8jurisdiction of the election authority, and the applicant is a 9registered voter in the precinct in which such facility is 10located, the ballots shall be prepared and transmitted to a 11responsible judge of election no later than 9 a.m. on the 12Friday, Saturday, Sunday, or Monday immediately preceding the 13election as designated by the election authority under Section 1419-12.2. Such judge shall deliver in person on the designated 15day the ballot to the applicant on the premises of the facility 16from which application was made. The election authority shall 17by mail notify the applicant in such facility that the ballot 18will be delivered by a judge of election on the designated day.19    All applications for vote by mail ballots shall be 20available at the office of the election authority for public 21inspection upon request from the time of receipt thereof by 22the election authority until 30 days after the election, 23except during the time such applications are kept in the 24office of the election authority pursuant to Section 19-7, and 25except during the time such applications are in the possession 26of the judges of election.  HB3296- 6 -LRB104 11004 SPS 21086 b1    Notwithstanding any provision of this Section to the 2contrary, pursuant to subsection (a) of Section 30 of the 3Address Confidentiality for Victims of Domestic Violence, 4Sexual Assault, Human Trafficking, or Stalking Act, neither 5the name nor the address of a program participant under that 6Act shall be included in any list of registered voters 7available to the public, including the lists referenced in 8this Section. 9    Notwithstanding any provision of this Section, the address 10of a voter who chooses to participate in the Voter Safety 11Confidentiality Program described in Section 1A-70 shall not 12be included in any list of registered voters available to the 13public, including the lists referenced in this Section. 14(Source: P.A. 102-292, eff. 1-1-22; 102-819, eff. 5-13-22; 15102-1126, eff. 2-10-23.)